Utah statutes.
20A-5-604.   Receipt of ballots by poll workers.

(1)  The poll worker who receives official or substitute ballots from the election officer shall:

(a)  sign a receipt for them and file it with the election officer; and

(b)  produce the packages in the proper polling place with the seals unbroken.

(2)  If the poll worker receives packages of substitute ballots accompanied by a written and sworn statement of the election officer that the ballots are substitute ballots because the original ballots were not received, were destroyed, or were stolen, the poll worker shall produce the packages of substitute ballots in the proper polling place with the seals unbroken.

